Tennessee, session 114, SB0436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-1013(e), is amended by adding
the language "or biosimilars" at the end of the subsection.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3502(f)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) A health carrier, health benefit plan, or utilization review organization from
requiring a patient to try an AB-rated generic equivalent product, interchangeable
biological product, or biosimilar product prior to providing coverage for the equivalent
branded prescription drug;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-198(c), is amended by adding
the language "or biosimilars" at the end of the subsection.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-2404(a), is amended by
deleting the language "including, but not limited to, efficacy, the use of generic drugs and
SB0436
001713
- 1 -

therapeutic equivalent drugs, and cost information related to each drug" and substituting
"including efficacy; the use of generic drugs, biosimilars, and therapeutic equivalent drugs; and
cost information related to each drug".
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001713